apertium-zh_CN-zh_TW.zh_TW.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<dictionary>
	<alphabet></alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="n"/>
    <sdef n="vblex"/>
    <sdef n="vbmod" />
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="adv" />
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="prn"/>
    <sdef n="num" />
    <sdef n="np" />
    
    <sdef n="alpha" />
    <sdef n="acr" />
    <sdef n="predet" />
    <sdef n="detnt" />
    <sdef n="top" />
    <sdef n="ant" />
    <sdef n="al" />
    <sdef n="cog" />
    <sdef n="atn" />
    <sdef n="enc" />
    <sdef n="pro" />
    <sdef n="tn" />
    <sdef n="re" />
    <sdef n="adj" />
    <sdef n="f" />
    <sdef n="m" />
    <sdef n="mf" />
    <sdef n="preadv" />
    <sdef n="pr" />
    <sdef n="rel" />
    <sdef n="nn" />
    <sdef n="an" />
    <sdef n="aa" />
    <sdef n="ind" />
    <sdef n="itg" />
    <sdef n="det" />
    <sdef n="dem" />
    <sdef n="def" />
    <sdef n="cnjcoo" />
    <sdef n="cnjsub" />
    <sdef n="cnjadv" />
    <sdef n="nt" />
 
    <sdef n="inf" />
    <sdef n="ger" />
    <sdef n="pp" />
    <sdef n="p1" />
    <sdef n="p2" />
    <sdef n="p3" />
    <sdef n="pii" />
    <sdef n="ifi" />
    <sdef n="fti" />
    <sdef n="cni" />
    <sdef n="prs" />
    <sdef n="pis" />
    <sdef n="fts" />
    <sdef n="imp" />
    <sdef n="pos" />
    <sdef n="sp" />
    <sdef n="ref" />
    <sdef n="sup" />
    <sdef n="ord" />
    <sdef n="qnt" />
    <sdef n="pron" />
    <sdef n="ij" />
    <sdef n="sent" />
    <sdef n="cm" />
    <sdef n="lpar" />
    <sdef n="rpar" />
    <sdef n="web" />
    <sdef n="apos" />
    <sdef n="percent" />
    <sdef n="guio" />
    <sdef n="past" />
    <sdef n="sep" />
    <sdef n="sint" />
    <sdef n="email" />
    <sdef n="obj" />
    <sdef n="subj" />
    <sdef n="subs" />
    <sdef n="pprs" />
    <sdef n="gen" />
    <sdef n="vbdo" />
    <sdef n="comp" />
    <sdef n="pres" />
    <sdef n="vaux" />
    <sdef n="sym" />
    <sdef n="ND" />
    <sdef n="GD" />
  </sdefs>
	
<pardefs>

<pardef n="我__prn">
  <e>       <p><l></l>		<r><s n="prn"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>們</l>		<r><s n="prn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="楠哥__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="小珊__np">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="房子__n">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="愛__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="vblex"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>	

<pardef n="我的__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="好__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>      	<r><s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="一定__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="非常__preadv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="preadv"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="哪裡__adv">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="和__cnjcoo">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
		
</pardefs>

<e lm="我"><i>我</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="你"><i>你</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="您"><i>您</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="他"><i>他</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="她"><i>她</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="它"><i>它</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="咱"><i>咱</i><par n="我__prn"/></e>
<e lm="楠哥"><i>楠哥</i><par n="楠哥__np"/></e>
<e lm="小珊"><i>小珊</i><par n="小珊__np"/></e>
<e lm="小明"><i>小明</i><par n="楠哥__np"/></e>
<e lm="小紅"><i>小紅</i><par n="小珊__np"/></e>
<e lm="愛"><i>愛</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="喜歡"><i>喜歡</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="在"><i>在</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="玩"><i>玩</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="玩耍"><i>玩耍</i><par n="愛__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="今天">		<i>今天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="昨天">		<i>昨天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="明天">		<i>明天</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="一起">		<i>一起</i><par n="一定__adv"/></e>
<e lm="哪裡">		<i>哪裡</i><par n="哪裡__adv"/></e>
<e lm="何時">		<i>何時</i><par n="哪裡__adv"/></e>
<e lm="我的">           <i>我的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="你的">           <i>你的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="他的">           <i>他的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="她的">           <i>她的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="它的">           <i>它的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="我們的">           <i>我們的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="你們的">           <i>你們的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="他們的">           <i>他們的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="她們的">           <i>她們的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="它們的">           <i>它們的</i><par n="我的__adj"/></e>
<e lm="好">           <i>好</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="好的">           <i>好的</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="壞">           <i>壞</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="壞的">           <i>壞的</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="大">           <i>大</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="小">           <i>小</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="冷">           <i>冷</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="暖">           <i>暖</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="暖和">           <i>暖和</i><par n="好__adj"/></e>
<e lm="更">             <i>更</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="就像">            <i>就像</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="差不多">            <i>差不多</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="那么">          <i>那么</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="真的">          <i>真的</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="如此">              <i>如此</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="很">             <i>很</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="非常">            <i>非常</i><par n="非常__preadv"/></e>
<e lm="和">		<i>和</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="但">		<i>但</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="但是">		<i>但是</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="不过">		<i>不过</i><par n="和__cnjcoo"/></e>
		<e lm="爸爸"><i>爸爸</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="半天"><i>半天</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="辦公室"><i>辦公室</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="北"><i>北</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="北邊兒"><i>北邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="比賽"><i>比賽</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="邊"><i>邊</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="部分"><i>部分</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="操場"><i>操場</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="茶"><i>茶</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="車站"><i>車站</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="城市"><i>城市</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="船"><i>船</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="窗戶"><i>窗戶</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="春"><i>春</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="磁帶"><i>磁帶</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="詞典"><i>詞典</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="錯誤"><i>錯誤</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="大學"><i>大學</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="刀"><i>刀</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="燈"><i>燈</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="地方"><i>地方</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="點心"><i>點心</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="電"><i>電</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="電燈"><i>電燈</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="電視"><i>電視</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="東"><i>東</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="東邊兒"><i>東邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="冬"><i>冬</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="動物"><i>動物</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="發現"><i>發現</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="法語"><i>法語</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="翻譯"><i>翻譯</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="飯店"><i>飯店</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="方面"><i>方面</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="房間"><i>房間</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="分鐘"><i>分鐘</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="夫人"><i>夫人</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="父親"><i>父親</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="幹部"><i>幹部</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="哥哥"><i>哥哥</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="根"><i>根</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="工作"><i>工作</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="故事"><i>故事</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="國家"><i>國家</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="寒假"><i>寒假</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="河"><i>河</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="後邊兒"><i>後邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="話"><i>話</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="活動"><i>活動</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="機會"><i>機會</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="技術"><i>技術</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="將來"><i>將來</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="教室"><i>教室</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="節日"><i>節日</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="經濟"><i>經濟</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="桔子"><i>桔子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="卡車"><i>卡車</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="課本"><i>課本</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="籃球"><i>籃球</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="裡邊"><i>裡邊</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="聯繫"><i>聯繫</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="留學生"><i>留學生</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="錄音"><i>錄音</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="帽子"><i>帽子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="麵包"><i>麵包</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="名字"><i>名字</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="南邊兒"><i>南邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="年級"><i>年級</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="農村"><i>農村</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="排球"><i>排球</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="朋友"><i>朋友</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="票"><i>票</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="鉛筆"><i>鉛筆</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="前邊兒"><i>前邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="情況"><i>情況</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="人"><i>人</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="日語"><i>日語</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="山"><i>山</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="上邊兒"><i>上邊兒</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="聲調"><i>聲調</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="省"><i>省</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="時間"><i>時間</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="事情"><i>事情</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="首都"><i>首都</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="水"><i>水</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="思想"><i>思想</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="湯"><i>湯</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="天氣"><i>天氣</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="同學"><i>同學</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="襪子"><i>襪子</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="外國人"><i>外國人</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="晚會"><i>晚會</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="文學"><i>文學</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="問題"><i>問題</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="西"><i>西</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="下"><i>下</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="夏"><i>夏</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="香蕉"><i>香蕉</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="小姐"><i>小姐</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="新年"><i>新年</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="信封"><i>信封</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期四"><i>星期四</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="星期日"><i>星期日</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="學校"><i>學校</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="眼睛"><i>眼睛</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="藥"><i>藥</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="衣服"><i>衣服</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="意思"><i>意思</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="英語"><i>英語</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="郵票"><i>郵票</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="雨"><i>雨</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="月"><i>月</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="運動"><i>運動</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="展覽"><i>展覽</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="知識"><i>知識</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="中午"><i>中午</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="週"><i>週</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="週四"><i>週四</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="周圍"><i>周圍</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="自行車"><i>自行車</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="組織"><i>組織</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="幫助"><i>幫助</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="帶"><i>帶</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="服務"><i>服務</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
		<e lm="關係"><i>關係</i><par n="房子__n"/></e>
